Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2305.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204(10) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(10) The sale at retail to or use by (i) any charitable organization, volunteer firemen's organization, volunteer 123456789101112131415161718192021 firefighters' relief association as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7412 (relating to definitions) or nonprofit educational institution, or (ii) a religious organization for religious purposes of tangible personal property or services other than pursuant to a construction contract: Provided, however, That [the]:(A) The exclusion of this clause shall not apply with respect to any tangible personal property or services used in any unrelated trade or business carried on by such organization or institution or with respect to any materials, supplies and equipment used and transferred to such organization or institution in the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, renovation, repairs and maintenance of any real estate structure, other than building machinery and equipment, except materials and supplies when purchased by such organizations or institutions for routine maintenance and repairs.(B) If the department has issued sales tax-exempt status to a volunteer firefighters' organization or a volunteer firefighters' relief association, the sales tax-exempt status may not expire unless the activities of the organization or association change so that the organization or association does not qualify as an institution of purely public charity in which case the organization or association shall immediately notify the department of the change. If the department ascertains that an organization or association no longer qualifies as an institution of purely public charity, the department may revoke the sales tax-exempt status of the organization or association.(C) The department may issue conditional tax-exempt status as a charitable organization to an organization, association or institution described in this clause for two years if the organization, association or institution meets the following:20260HB2305PN3202 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) is qualified under section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and (4)) as evidenced by a determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service;(II) satisfies section 5(c) of the act of November 26, 1997 (P.L.508, No.55), known as the Institutions of Purely Public Charity Act; and(III) has a three-year business plan that meets section 5(b), (d), (e) and (f) of the Institutions of Purely Public Charity Act.(D) The department may issue an assessment under section 230 if the department determines that the conditional tax-exempt status under subclause (C) was improperly issued or if the organization, association or institution fails to meet section 5(b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) of the Institutions of Purely Public Charity Act within two years of receiving conditional tax-exempt status.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days. JANUARY 1, 2027, OR IN 90 DAYS, WHICHEVER IS LATER.20260HB2305PN3202 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920